Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. Loads

§ 1451.
Loads on passenger cars.

No person shall operate a passenger type motor vehicle upon any highway with any load carried thereon extending beyond the line of the fenders on the left side of such vehicle nor extending more than six inches beyond the line of the fenders on the right side thereof, nor when any baggage or other object is carried in a way to obscure either number plate or any light on such vehicle.

§ 1452.
Securing loads of wood or wood products.

As used in this section:

“Load” means the total of wood or wood products being carried.

“Tier” means the total vertical height of all wood or wood products arranged individually or in layers, or in bundles placed one above the other.

“Binding” means chain, wire rope, steel cable, steel strapping, or nylon webbing together with tightening device.

A person may not operate a motor truck, truck tractor, trailer, or semi-trailer on a public highway carrying wood or wood products unless the load is securely fastened to the vehicle and each load or tier up to a length of five feet inclusive shall be fastened with one binding; if the length exceeds five feet but does not exceed 10 feet, it shall be fastened with two bindings; if the length exceeds 10 feet, it shall be fastened with three bindings.

The ends of any bindings, whether the vehicle is loaded or unloaded, shall be so secured that loose ends do not endanger pedestrians, motorists, or other vehicles using the highway.

Any bindings used hereunder shall have a capacity of at least 2,750 pounds working load limit as rated by the manufacturer.

This section shall not be construed to include a truck transporting lumber, wood, or sawmill wastes, when transported in a box-type body with solid sides, provided that such truck is not loaded higher than its side-boards.

HISTORY:

Amended

1967, No. 326

(Adj. Sess.);

1971, No. 118

, eff. April 26, 1971;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 206.

§ 1453.
Baled products.

An individual shall not operate a motor vehicle loaded with baled hay or straw or other baled products with any portion of the load extending beyond the front end of the vehicle bed; with the exception that a load extension is permitted beyond the front end of a truck bed, over the driver’s compartment or sleeping berth, provided this portion of the load is supported by permanent and substantial steel frame construction. Loads of baled hay, straw, or other baled products shall be solidly packed while in transit.
(a) (1) An individual shall not operate a motor vehicle loaded with baled hay or straw or other baled products with any portion of the load extending beyond the front end of the vehicle bed; with the exception that a load extension is permitted beyond the front end of a truck bed, over the driver’s compartment or sleeping berth, provided this portion of the load is supported by permanent and substantial steel frame construction. Loads of baled hay, straw, or other baled products shall be solidly packed while in transit.

Such loads, unless supported by substantially constructed sideboards or rack type bodies, shall be fastened securely to the vehicle by not less than two longitudinal binders and by a cross binder for each tier of baled hay or straw or other baled products, such binders to be of sufficient strength to hold such load in place. Such loads may be transported without sideboards and the binders specified in this subdivision if fastened by any commercial binding device equal or superior to the provisions set forth in this section. Such commercial binding device shall be approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall not apply to a farmer engaged in farming operations where such transportation requires that he or she use the public highways; provided, however, that the farmer loads and transports the loads in a reasonably safe manner.

Any enforcement officer may stop and inspect vehicles in respect to compliance with the provisions of this section, and if it is found that the load is being transported in violation of this section, the enforcement officer may arrest without warrant and shall prohibit the operator of such vehicle from continuing en route until the load has been made to comply with this section.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 207.

§ 1454.
Securing loads.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle nor draw a trailer or semi-trailer on a highway unless the motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer is so constructed and loaded that it will create no hazard to other users of the highway.

The Commissioner may, by rule, impose design and load security requirements, consistent with nationally recognized safety standards, upon motor vehicles, trailers, and semi-trailers in order to provide for the safe and secure transport of any loads.

HISTORY:

1961, No. 62

, §§ 1, 2; amended

1971, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

1997, No. 46

, § 7.